Illinois, session 104th, HB3388.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 1-120.7 and 3-808.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/1-120.7)7    Sec. 1-120.7. Fire department vehicle. Any vehicle, 8recreational off-highway vehicle, all-terrain vehicle, 9watercraft, aircraft, bicycle, or electric personal assistive 10mobility device that is designated or authorized by proper 11local authorities for fire department use.12(Source: P.A. 95-28, eff. 8-7-07.) 13    (625 ILCS 5/3-808.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-808.1)14    Sec. 3-808.1. Permanent vehicle registration plate. 15    (a) Permanent vehicle registration plates shall be issued, 16at no charge, to the following:17        1. Vehicles, other than medical transport vehicles, 18    owned and operated by the State of Illinois or by any State 19    agency financed by funds appropriated by the General 20    Assembly;21        2. Special disability plates issued to vehicles owned 22    and operated by the State of Illinois or by any State   HB3388 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08286 LNS 18337 b1    agency financed by funds appropriated by the General 2    Assembly.3    (b) Permanent vehicle registration plates shall be issued, 4for a one-time fee of $8.00, to the following:5        1. Vehicles, other than medical transport vehicles, 6    operated by or for any county, township or municipal 7    corporation.8        2. Vehicles owned by counties, townships or municipal 9    corporations for persons with disabilities.10        3. Beginning with the 1991 registration year, 11    county-owned vehicles operated by or for any county 12    sheriff and designated deputy sheriffs. These registration 13    plates shall contain the specific county code and unit 14    number.15        4. All-terrain vehicles owned by counties, townships, 16    or municipal corporations and used for law enforcement 17    purposes or used as fire department vehicles when the 18    Manufacturer's Statement of Origin is accompanied with a 19    letter from the original manufacturer or a manufacturer's 20    franchised dealer stating that this all-terrain vehicle 21    has been converted to a street worthy vehicle that meets 22    the equipment requirements set forth in Chapter 12 of this 23    Code.24        5. Beginning with the 2001 registration year, 25    municipally owned vehicles operated by or for any police 26    department. These registration plates shall contain the   HB3388 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08286 LNS 18337 b1    designation "municipal police" and shall be numbered and 2    distributed as prescribed by the Secretary of State.3        6. Beginning with the 2014 registration year, 4    municipally owned, fire district owned, or Mutual Aid Box 5    Alarm System (MABAS) owned vehicles operated by or for any 6    fire department, fire protection district, or MABAS. These 7    registration plates shall display the designation "Fire 8    Department" and shall display the specific fire 9    department, fire district, fire unit, or MABAS division 10    number or letter. 11        7. Beginning with the 2017 registration year, vehicles 12    that do not require a school bus driver permit under 13    Section 6-104 to operate and are not registered under 14    Section 3-617 of this Code, and are owned by a public 15    school district from grades K-12 or a public community 16    college. 17        8. Beginning with the 2017 registration year, vehicles 18    of the first division or vehicles of the second division 19    weighing not more than 8,000 pounds that are owned by a 20    medical facility or hospital of a municipality, county, or 21    township. 22        9. Beginning with the 2020 registration year, 2-axle 23    motor vehicles that (i) are designed and used as buses in a 24    public system for transporting more than 10 passengers; 25    (ii) are used as common carriers in the general 26    transportation of passengers and not devoted to any   HB3388 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08286 LNS 18337 b1    specialized purpose; (iii) operate entirely within the 2    territorial limits of a single municipality or a single 3    municipality and contiguous municipalities; and (iv) are 4    subject to the regulation of the Illinois Commerce 5    Commission. The owner of a vehicle under this paragraph is 6    exempt from paying a flat weight tax or a mileage weight 7    tax under this Code. 8    (b-5) Beginning with the 2016 registration year, permanent 9vehicle registration plates shall be issued for a one-time fee 10of $8.00 to a county, township, or municipal corporation that 11owns or operates vehicles used for the purpose of community 12workplace commuting as defined by the Secretary of State by 13administrative rule. The design and color of the plates shall 14be wholly within the discretion of the Secretary. The 15Secretary of State may adopt rules to implement this 16subsection (b-5). 17    (c) Beginning with the 2012 registration year, 18county-owned vehicles operated by or for any county sheriff 19and designated deputy sheriffs that have been issued 20registration plates under subsection (b) of this Section shall 21be exempt from any fee for the transfer of registration from 22one vehicle to another vehicle. Each county sheriff shall 23report to the Secretary of State any transfer of registration 24plates from one vehicle to another vehicle operated by or for 25any county sheriff and designated deputy sheriffs. The 26Secretary of State shall adopt rules to implement this   HB3388 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08286 LNS 18337 b1subsection (c).2    (c-5) Beginning with the 2014 registration year, 3municipally owned, fire district owned, or Mutual Aid Box 4Alarm System (MABAS) owned vehicles operated by or for any 5fire department, fire protection district, or MABAS that have 6been issued registration plates under subsection (b) of this 7Section shall be exempt from any fee for the transfer of 8registration from one vehicle to another vehicle. Each fire 9department, fire protection district, of MABAS shall report to 10the Secretary of State any transfer of registration plates 11from one vehicle to another vehicle operated by or for any fire 12department, fire protection district, or MABAS. The Secretary 13of State shall adopt rules to implement this subsection. 14    (d) Beginning with the 2013 registration year, municipally 15owned vehicles operated by or for any police department that 16have been issued registration plates under subsection (b) of 17this Section shall be exempt from any fee for the transfer of 18registration from one vehicle to another vehicle. Each 19municipal police department shall report to the Secretary of 20State any transfer of registration plates from one vehicle to 21another vehicle operated by or for any municipal police 22department. The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to 23implement this subsection (d). 24    (e) Beginning with the 2016 registration year, any vehicle 25owned or operated by a county, township, or municipal 26corporation that has been issued registration plates under   HB3388 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08286 LNS 18337 b1this Section is exempt from any fee for the transfer of 2registration from one vehicle to another vehicle. Each county, 3township, or municipal corporation shall report to the 4Secretary of State any transfer of registration plates from 5one vehicle to another vehicle operated by or for any county, 6township, or municipal corporation. 7    (f) Beginning with the 2020 registration year, any vehicle 8owned or operated by a public school district from grades 9K-12, a public community college, or a medical facility or 10hospital of a municipality, county, or township that has been 11issued registration plates under this Section is exempt from 12any fee for the transfer of registration from one vehicle to 13another vehicle. Each school district, public community 14college, or medical facility or hospital shall report to the 15Secretary any transfer of registration plates from one vehicle 16to another vehicle operated by the school district, public 17community college, or medical facility. 18    (g) Beginning with the 2025 registration year, vehicles 19owned or operated by or for a private or public university 20police department or a private or public college police 21department, except for motor driven cycles and all-terrain 22vehicles, may be registered under subsection (b) of this 23Section. These registration plates shall contain the 24designation "university police" or "college police" and shall 25be numbered and distributed as prescribed by the Secretary of 26State.   HB3388 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08286 LNS 18337 b1(Source: P.A. 103-135, eff. 1-1-24.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.